en: tarragon
af: Draakplant
ar: طرخون
az: tərxun
be: эстрагон
bg: Естрагон
bn: তার্খুন
br: Stragon
bs: estragon
ca: estragó
co: arba dragona
cs: estragon
cy: taragon
da: estragon
de: Estragon
el: εστραγκόν
eo: estragono
es: dragón, Estragon
et: estragonpuju
eu: binagrera
fa: ترخون
fi: rakuuna
fr: estragon
ga: dragan
gl: estragón
gv: dragane
he: לענה דרקונית
hr: Zmijina trava
hu: tárkony
hy: թարխուն
id: tarragon
io: estragono
it: dragoncello
ja: タラゴン
ka: ტარხუნა
kk: шырғалжың
ko: 타라곤
ku: tarxûn
la: Artemisia dracunculus
lt: Estragonas
mk: естрагон
ms: taragon
nb: estragon
nl: dragon
nn: estragon
oc: estragon
os: мæзæрæу
pa: ਤਰਖ਼ੋਨ
pl: Estragon, Draganek
pt: estragão
ro: tarhon
ru: эстрагон
sk: Estragón
sl: pehtran
sq: terragoni
sr: естрагон
sv: dragon
tr: tarhun
uk: тархун
uz: sherolgʻin
zh: 龍蒿

en: Fresh tarragon
bg: Пресен естрагон
es: Estragón fresco
fr: Estragon frais
hr: Svježi estragon
nl: Verse dragon
pl: Estragon świeży, Draganek świeży

en: Ground dried tarragon
es: Estragón seco molido
fr: Estragon sec moulu
hr: Samljeveni suhi estragon
nl: Gedroogde gemalen dragon
pl: Estragon suszony mielony, Draganek suszony mielony

en: Dried tarragon
fr: Estragon séché
hr: Sušeni estragon
pl: Estragon suszony, Draganek suszony

en: Thyme, Common thyme, Garden thyme
bg: Мащерка
da: Timian
de: Thymian
es: Tomillo
fi: Timjami
fr: Thym, Thym commun, Thym cultivé, Farigoule
hr: Timijan
ja: タイム
la: Thymus vulgaris
lt: Čiobreliai
nb: Timian
nl: Thijm
pl: Tymianek, Tymianek właściwy, Tymian, Macierzanka zwyczajna
sv: Timjan

en: Fresh thyme
da: Frisk timian
es: Tomillo fresco
fr: Thym frais
hr: Svježi timijan
lt: Švieži čiobreliai
nl: Verse thijm
pl: Tymianek świeży
sv: Färsk timjan

en: Dried thyme
da: Tørret timian
fr: Thym séché
hr: Sušeni timijan
lt: Džiovinti čiobreliai
pl: Tymianek suszony
sv: Torkad timjan

en: Ground dried thyme
de: Thymian gerebelt
es: Tomillo seco molido
fr: Thym sec moulu, thym séché moulu, thym séché moulue
hr: Samljevena sušena majčina dušica
lt: Džiovinti malti čiobreliai
nl: Gemalen gedroogde verse thijm
pl: Tymianek suszony mielony

en: Thyme tea bags
de: Thymian Teebeutel
es: Tomillo en bolsitas para infusión
fr: Infusions de thym
hr: Vrećice čaja od majčine dušice
lt: Čiobreliai arbatos maišeliuose
nl: Thijm in theezakjes
pl: Tymianek w torebkach

en: Bay laurel, Sweet bay, Bay tree, Bay leaves
bg: Дафинов лист
de: Lorbeer
es: Laurel
fr: Laurier, Laurier sauce, Laurier noble, Laurier vrai, Feuilles de laurier
hr: Lovor
ja: ローリエ
la: Laurus nobilis
lt: Laurų lapai
nl: Laurier
pl: Liście laurowe, Liść laurowy, Wawrzyn szlachetny

en: Fresh bay laurel
es: Laurel fresco
fr: Laurier frais
hr: Svježi lovor
lt: Švieži laurų lapai
nl: Verse laurier
pl: Liście laurowe świeże, Liść laurowy świeży

en: Ground dried bay laurel
es: Laurel seco molido
fr: Laurier sec moulu
hr: Samljeveni osušeni lovor
lt: Džiovinti malti laurų lapai
nl: Gemalen gedroogde laurier
pl: Liście laurowe suszone mielone, Liść laurowy suszony mielony

en: Dried bay laurel
de: getrocknete Lorbeerblätter
es: Laurel seco
fr: Laurier sec
hr: Osušeni lovor
lt: Džiovinti laurų lapai
nl: Gedroogde laurier
pl: Liście laurowe suszone, Liść laurowy suszony

en: Lemon grass, Lemongrass
bg: Лимонена трева
de: Zitronengras
es: Citronela, Hierba limón, Lemongrass
fr: Citronnelle, Verveine des Indes, Lemongrass
hr: Limunska trava
ja: レモングラス
la: Cymbopogon citratus
lt: Citrinžolė
nl: Citroengras
pl: Trawa cytrynowa, Palczatka cytrynowa

en: Molokhia powder, Dried jute leaves
fr: Meloukhia en poudre, Feuilles de corète séchées en poudre

en: Mixed herbs, Mixtures of aromatic plants
es: Mezclas de plantas aromáticas
fi: maustekasvisekoitukset
fr: Mélanges de plantes aromatiques
hr: Miješano bilje
it: Misto di piante aromatiche, Piante aromatiche miste
lt: Aromatinių augalų mišinys
nl: Kruidenmelanges, Kruidenmengsels, Kruidenpastas
pl: Mieszanki ziół, Mieszanki ziołowe

en: Bouquet garni
es: Bouquets garnis, Bouquet garni
fr: Bouquets garnis, Bouquet garni
hr: Buket garni
nl: Kruidenbuiltjes

en: Fresh bouquet garni
es: Bouquets garnis frescos
fr: Bouquets garnis fraîches
hr: Svježi buket garni
nl: Verse kruidenbuiltjes

en: Ground dried bouquet garni
es: Bouquet garni seco molido
fr: Bouquet garni sec moulu
hr: Mljeveni osušeni buket garni
nl: Gemalen gedroogde kruidenbuiltjes

en: Dried bouquet garni
es: Bouquet garni seco
fr: Bouquet garni sec
hr: Sušeni buket garni
nl: Gedroogde kruidenbuiltjes